src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! ### SETS BY CONSONANT QUALITY
LEXICON INF-TYPE-EVEN-SYLL-STRONG-GRADE-IN-VOWEL-A
: Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
: Harm_Neutr_INF_ZEROq ;

: Harm_Neutr_ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_USUALLY-STRONG ; !!= * @CODE@ kaota
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, +Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2, 
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2

: ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq ; !!= * @CODE@ 
!! +Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3, +Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3

: Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;



!! ### INDICATIVE PRESENT ACTIVE CONJUGATION
LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS-12
 ACT_IND_PRS-SG1_ZERO ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_dEq ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_tiq ;
!+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ; These will be dealt with in cg
!+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t K ; These will be dealt with in cg

LEXICON Harm_Neutr_ACT_IND_PRS-SG1_ZERO_USUALLY-WEAK
 ACT_IND_PRS-SG1_ZERO ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
+Act+Imprt+Sg2: K ;


LEXICON Harm_Neutr_ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_USUALLY-STRONG
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_dEq ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_tiq ;



LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS-SG1_ZERO
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: K ;


LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq
ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq ;
ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_tiq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq
ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t ;
ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_dEq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_dEq
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>d%{eõ%} K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_iq
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>iq K ;
+Err/Dial+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>i K ;


LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq
ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;
ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;


LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>mi K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_tiq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ti K ;

!LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_t
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_dEq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>d%{eõ%} K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_sE
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>s%{eõ%} K ;

!LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_iAq
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>i%{aä%}q K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>v%{aä%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>v%{aä%} K ;


LEXICON ACT_IND_PRS_3_s/sEq
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>s K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>s%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ss%{eõ%}q K ;!õdaguvõro tendents
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>s%{eõ%} K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>ss%{eõ%} K ;!õdaguvõro tendents

LEXICON ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1
 ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_PRS-SG1_ZERO ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_CONNEG
+Act: IND-CONNEG ;
LEXICON PSS_IND_CONNEG
+Pss: IND-CONNEG ;
LEXICON IND-CONNEG
+Ind+Prs+Neg:%-%{XV%}iq K ; !!= * @CODE@ This gives stress
+Err/Orth-no-q+Ind+Prs+Neg:%-iq K ; !!= * @CODE@ This gives stress
+Err/Orth-no-q+Ind+Prs+Neg:%-%{XV%}i K ; !!= * @CODE@ more neutral without q
+Err/Orth-no-q+Ind+Prs+Neg:%-i K ; !!= * @CODE@ more neutral without q
+Ind+ConNeg:%>q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Ind+ConNeg: K ;
+Ind+Prt+Neg:%-%{XV%}s K ;
+Err/Dial+Ind+Prt+Neg:%-s K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_CONNEGII
+Act+Ind+ConNegII: K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_CONNEGII
+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_CONNEGII_dA
+Pss+Ind+ConNegII:%>d%{aä%} K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_CONNEGII_tA
+Pss+Ind+ConNegII:%>t%{aä%} K ;

LEXICON ACT-COND
+Act: COND ;
LEXICON PSS-COND
+Pss: COND ;
LEXICON COND
+Cond+Prs+Neg:%>si%-iq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Cond+Prs+Neg:%>si%-i K ;
+Cond+Prt+Neg:%>si%-is K ;
+Cond+ConNeg:%>siq K ;
+Cond+ConNegII:%>si K ;



!! ### JUS
LEXICON ACT_JUS_guq !!= * @CODE@ regardless of harmony this is back 
!+Act+Jus:%>guq%{back%} K ;
!+Act+Jus+ConNeg:%>guq-ui%{back%} K ;
!+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Jus:%>gu%{back%} K ;
!+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Jus+ConNeg:%>gu-ui%{back%} K ;
+Jus:%>guq%{back%} K ;
+Jus+ConNeg:%>guq-ui%{back%} K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Jus:%>gu%{back%} K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Jus+ConNeg:%>gu-ui%{back%} K ;

LEXICON ACT_JUS_kuq 
!+Act+Jus:%>kuq%{back%} K ;
!+Act+Jus+ConNeg:%>kuq-ui%{back%} K ;
!+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Jus:%>ku%{back%} K ;
!+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Jus+ConNeg:%>ku-ui%{back%} K ;
+Jus:%>kuq%{back%} K ;
+Jus+ConNeg:%>kuq-ui%{back%} K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Jus:%>ku%{back%} K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Jus+ConNeg:%>ku-ui%{back%} K ;

!! CHECK THIS
!!
LEXICON PSS_d
PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA ;
 PSS_PRFPRC_d ;
 PSS_PRFPRC_dU-SG_NOM ;
PSS_PRSPRC_dAv ;
 PSS_IND_PRT_SG1_di/SG3_di ;
 
!! ### PASSIVE INDICATIVE PRESENT CONJUGATION

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_tA
PSS_IND_SG1_tX ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAt ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAdEq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_tAs ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_tAmiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_tAtiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL3_tAsEq ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA
PSS_IND_SG1_dX ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAt ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAdEq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_dAs ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_dAmiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_dAtiq ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>d%{aä%}d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>d%{aä%}d%{eõ%} K ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL3_dAsEq ;


!LEXICON Harm_Neutr_VISKAMA_PSS_IND_PRS
!PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_dX
PSS_IND_SG1_dX ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAt ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAdEq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_dAs ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_dAmiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_dAtiq ;
PSS_PRSPRC_dAv ;
PSS_PRFPRC_d/SG_GEN_dU ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PL1_tXmiq/2_tXt
 PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_tAmiq ;
 PSS_IND_PRT_PL1_timiq ;
 PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAt ;
 PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_tit ;
 PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_tAtiq ;
 PSS_IND_PRT_PL2_titiq ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX
PSS_IND_SG1_dX ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAt ;
PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_tit ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAdEq ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_tidEq ;
PSS_IND_SG3_tX ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_tAmiq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL1_dimiq ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_tAtiq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL2_ditiq ;
: PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG1_dX/2_tX/SG3_tX
PSS_IND_SG1_dX ;
PSS_IND_SG3_tX ;

PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_tAmiq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL1_timiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_tAtiq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL2_titiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAt ;
PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_tit ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAdEq ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_tidEq ;

PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG1_dX/2_dX/SG3_tX
PSS_IND_SG1_dX ;
: PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAt ;
PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_dit ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAtiq ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_titiq ;
PSS_IND_SG3_tX ;
: PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_dAmiq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL1_dimiq ;
: PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_dAtiq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL2_ditiq ;
PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG1_tX/SG3_tX
PSS_IND_SG1_tX ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAt ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAdEq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_tAs ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_tAmiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_tAtiq ;
PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;

!LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG1_dA/SG3_dAs
!PSS_IND_SG1_dX ;
!PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAt ;
!PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAdEq ;
!PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_dAs ;
!PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_dAmiq ;
!PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_dAtiq ;
!PSS_PRSPRC_dAv ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_CONNEG_tA
:%>t%{aä%} PSS_IND_CONNEG ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_CONNEG_dA
:%>d%{aä%} PSS_IND_CONNEG ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG1_dX
 PSS_IND_PRS_SG1_dA ;
 PSS_IND_PRT_SG1_di ;
LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG1_dA
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>d%{aä%} K ;
!2023_03_24PSS_IND_CONNEG_dA ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG1_tX
 PSS_IND_PRS_SG1_tA ;
 PSS_IND_PRT_SG1_ti ;
LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG1_tA
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>t%{aä%} K ;
PSS_IND_CONNEG_tA ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAt
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t%{aä%}t K ;
LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAt
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>d%{aä%}t K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAdEq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t%{aä%}d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t%{aä%}d%{eõ%} K ;
LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAtiq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t%{aä%}tiq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t%{aä%}ti K ;
LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_dAdEq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>d%{aä%}d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>d%{aä%}d%{eõ%} K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_dAs
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>d%{aä%}s K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG3_tX
PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_tAs ;
PSS_IND_PRT_SG3_ti ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_SG3_dX
PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_dAs ;
PSS_IND_PRT_SG3_di ;
LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_tAs
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>t%{aä%}s K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_tAmiq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>t%{aä%}miq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>t%{aä%}mi K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_dAmiq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>d%{aä%}miq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>d%{aä%}mi K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_tAtiq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t%{aä%}tiq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>t%{aä%}ti K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_dAtiq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>d%{aä%}tiq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>d%{aä%}ti K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_PL3_tAsEq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>t%{aä%}s%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>t%{aä%}s%{eõ%} K ;

LEXICON PSS_IND_PRS_PL3_dAsEq
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>d%{aä%}s%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>d%{aä%}s%{eõ%} K ;

LEXICON Harm_Neutr_JUVVA_PSS_IND_PRS !!= * @CODE@ juvva süvvä
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: K ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>s K ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>mi K ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>ti K ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>s%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>s%{eõ%} K ;
 PSS_IND_CONNEG ;


LEXICON Harm_Neutr_JUVVA_PSS_IND_PRT_1/2 !!= * @CODE@ juvvi süvvi
+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: K ;
+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>t K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>q K ;
+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>miq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>mi K ;
+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>tiq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>ti K ;
!+Err/Dial+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ; These will be dealt with in cg


!! ### INDICATIVE PRETERIT SUBJECT CONJUGATION
LEXICON Harm_Neutr_IND-PRT-SCSG1_iE
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i%{eõ%} K ;


!LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_i/PL3_iq
!ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO ;
!ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_E/PL3_Eq
ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_E ;
ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_Eq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q
ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO ;
ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_sE/PL3_sEq
ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_sE ;
ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_sEq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: K ;

!24LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_i
!+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>i K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_sE
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>s%{eõ%} K ;
LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_E
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>%{eõ%} K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_it/idEq/PL1_imiq/PL2_itiq
:%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t ;
:%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_dEq ;
:%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_miq ;
:%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_tiq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_Et/EdEq/PL1_Emiq/PL2_Etiq
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_Et ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_EdEq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_Emiq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_Etiq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_dEq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_miq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_tiq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_q/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_q ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_dEq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_miq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_tiq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_sE
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_sE ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEt ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEdEq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_sE ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_sEmiq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_sEtiq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_sEq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEt/sEdEq/PL1_sEmiq/PL2_sEtiq
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEt ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_sEdEq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_sEmiq ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_sEtiq ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>t K ;

!24LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_it
!+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>it K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_Et
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%{eõ%}t K ;


!24LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_idEq
!+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>id%{eõ%}q K ;
!+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>id%{eõ%} K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_EdEq
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%{eõ%}d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%{eõ%}d%{eõ%} K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_dEq
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>d%{eõ%} K ;


!2022-03-24LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_imiq
!+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>imiq K ;
!+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>imi K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_miq
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>miq K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>mi K ;

LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_dEq
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>d%{eõ%} K ;

!24LEXICON ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_itiq
!+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>itiq K ;
!+Err/Orth-no-q+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>iti K ;
